Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-350
Bailiff; term; compensation.

The judge of the district court may, if the business of the court requires, appoint a bailiff or bailiffs. In counties having more than sixty thousand inhabitants, bailiffs shall be appointed and shall hold office for a term of one year unless sooner removed by the appointing judge. In counties having not more than sixty thousand inhabitants, the appointment shall continue only so long as is necessary. Bailiffs shall receive for their services either (a) an annual salary in an amount to be fixed by the county board, payable in monthly installments from the county general fund, or (b) a per diem in an amount to be fixed by the county board, payable monthly from the county general fund.

R.S.1866, c. 19, § 32, p. 171;

Laws 1895, c. 36, § 1, p. 165;

Laws 1909, c. 59, § 1, p. 289;

R.S.1913, § 2431;

Laws 1919, c. 12, § 1, p. 72;

C.S.1922, § 2371;

Laws 1927, c. 119, § 1, p. 332;

C.S.1929, § 33-110;

Laws 1943, c. 90, § 17, p. 304;

R.S.1943, § 33-107;

Laws 1945, c. 73, § 1, p. 275;

Laws 1959, c. 141, § 1, p. 548;

Laws 1961, c. 158, § 1, p. 481;

Laws 1969, c. 269, § 1, p. 1033;

Laws 1975, LB 277, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 33-107;

Laws 1989, LB 4, § 4.

For other provisions for salaries of county officers and employees, see sections 23-1114 to 23-1114.09.

This section, as it existed in 1911, did not authorize the appointment of special bailiffs to take charge of witnesses for the state in pending criminal prosecutions. Shaw v. Holt County, 88 Neb. 348, 129 N.W. 552 (1911).